California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

937.5.

The commissioner may promulgate regulations that further the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.9. Zero-Emission Heavy-Duty Truck Data Reporting [938. - 938.1.]

938.

(a) The Department of Insurance shall implement specific data collections on the availability and affordability of insurance for heavy-duty trucks and truck fleets that utilize advanced fuels and related technologies to better understand emerging markets important to the State of California’s climate change goals, expand insurance options by establishing more robust data for consumers and insurers, and identify potential barriers to zero-emission technologies in the transportation sector. The focus of the data collections shall be zero-emission technologies that reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve air quality when compared with conventional or fully commercialized alternatives, including those defined by the State Air
 Resources Board.

(b) The department shall issue a bulletin on or before February 1, 2024, to initiate the first data collection. Admitted insurers shall respond on or before May 1, 2024. Data collections shall include surveys and data calls from insurance companies licensed to write insurance through the admitted market. The surveys and data calls shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Whether an insurance company offers insurance for zero-emission truck options.

(2) Loss experience information per claim over a specified time period, such as annually, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Type of
 loss, which may include both liability and physical damage type losses.

(B) Type of medium- and heavy-duty truck.

(C) Date of loss.

(D) Amount of losses incurred and paid in United States dollars.

(3) The number of vehicles covered under insurance policies,

(4) Policy level experience, including, but not limited to, premium per type of medium- and heavy-duty truck insured, the time the truck is insured from effective start date to end date of coverage, and type of coverage, which may include both liability and physical damage type coverage.

(5) Minimum, maximum, and average overall coverage limit of the policy, and per type of medium- and heavy-duty truck within a truck fleet.

(c) The information required by this section shall be submitted to the commissioner. The commissioner may specify, by bulletin, the manner of submission and format of the reporting required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), the commissioner shall
 publish
 information compiled from the data submitted pursuant to this section in the aggregate and shall not identify an individual respondent or insurer, except to support consumer understanding of insurance options as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 938.1. The commissioner shall establish and maintain a link on the department’s internet website that provides public access to the aggregate information required to be disclosed pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) Information submitted to the commissioner, as required by this section, shall be confidential pursuant to Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and exempt from the California Public Records Act
 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Additionally, that information shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum. Testimony by the commissioner, the commissioner’s staff, an employee of the department, or a person to whom the reporting required by this section was disclosed, regarding the contents of any report submitted pursuant to this section, shall be inadmissible as evidence in a civil proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 347, Sec. 2.   (AB 844)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

938.1.

(a) The Department of Insurance, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall create a consumer-focused online insurance information resource tool, based on data collected pursuant to Section 938, for the public to use to readily find information and insurance options for battery-powered, hydrogen-powered, or other zero-emission advanced truck technology, including which insurance companies offer
 insurance for trucks or fleets using different zero-emission technologies and any relevant coverage limits or fleet size specifications, to provide a “one-stop” for the public.

(b) The Department of Insurance, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall provide an assessment of all of the following:

(1) The availability and affordability of insurance for existing and emerging advanced fleet technologies being deployed for heavy-duty vehicles.

(2) The role of insurance markets in meeting the goals of Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 39710) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code and the greenhouse gas reduction and short-lived climate pollutant emissions reduction goals
 of the state.

(c) On or before January 1, 2025, the Department of Insurance, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall create a strategy to address current and future insurance gaps for new heavy-duty truck technologies, including consideration for establishing a risk pool and other tools to offer insurance to truck fleet businesses and individual truck owners who are unable to find insurance in the private insurance markets. This strategy shall include an evaluation of all of the following:

(1) The number of companies offering insurance for zero-emission truck fleets, or individual zero-emission trucks, in the current market.

(2) The impact of existing electric and hydrogen truck insurance policies
 on emissions reductions from the heavy-duty truck sector.

(3) Availability of actuarial loss data for electric and hydrogen trucks, or fleets of those trucks.

(4) Coverage limits most appropriate for zero-emission truck fleets, based on the common size and characteristics of zero-emission trucking fleets.

(5) Additional insurance related information, including information collected pursuant to Section 938.

(6) Important timelines and specific checkpoints for monitoring insurance accessibility in advance of major regulatory deadlines for transitioning medium- and heavy-duty fleets to
 zero-emission technologies, and state goals for increasing the percentage of zero-emission trucks and buses in the state.

(d) The State Air Resources Board shall provide information necessary to support the Department of Insurance in the development of the evaluation described in subdivision (c), including, but not limited to, the information required by paragraphs (2) and (6) of subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 347, Sec. 2.   (AB 844)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Deposit of Securities [939. - 956.]

939.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, all deposits of securities with the commissioner shall be subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

940.

The commissioner shall accept and hold securities in trust for the policyholders or policyholders and creditors of an insurer and for their benefit, whenever (a) the law of another state or of a foreign country requires such a deposit with an officer of this state as a prerequisite to transacting insurance business in that state or country, or (b) the law of this state requires such a deposit with an officer of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

940.1.

The commissioner shall require the payment of fifty-eight dollars ($58) in lawful money of the United States in advance for receiving and processing securities or deposit schedules for securities deposited pursuant to this article. An additional fee of twenty-nine dollars ($29) shall be payable for each withdrawal, substitution, or any other change in the securities comprising such deposit. There shall be no other or additional fee for attaching the commissioner’s seal to a securities deposit schedule for a deposit under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

941.

Such deposited securities shall not be estimated above their par value nor above their market value, except that preferred stock shall be estimated only at its market value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

942.

The commissioner shall permit a deposit of those securities in the State Treasury, subject to the provisions of Section 11691, if applicable. The securities deposited with the Treasurer shall be maintained in electronic book entry or certificate form as security for policyholders or policyholders and creditors of the insurer to whom they respectively belong. The state is responsible for the custody and safe return of any money or securities so deposited. The Treasurer shall deposit these moneys under the provisions of Sections 16370 and 16375 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 6.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

943.

So long as the insurer continues solvent the commissioner shall permit it to collect the interest or dividends on the securities so deposited, and from time to time to withdraw any such securities on depositing other securities in the stead of those to be withdrawn. Such new securities shall be of the same value as those withdrawn and of the character mentioned in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

944.

Securities deposited under the provisions of this article shall not be withdrawn from the State treasury except upon the written order of the insurer making the deposits, with the endorsement of the commissioner thereon, or upon the order of some court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

945.

If the deposit is of mortgages, it shall be accompanied either by full abstracts of title with the fees for examination of title, or by policies of title insurance or certificates of title issued by an admitted title insurer. The fees for appraisal of the property shall be paid by the insurer making the deposit. In any case where he ascertains that the expense thereof would not be unreasonable or such as to make the deposit impracticable, the commissioner may require a policy of title insurance or a guaranty that the abstract is correct and that it shows title to be in the proper parties, issued by a corporation authorized to issue such policies or guaranties in the State in which the security or some part thereof is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

946.

If the deposit is of stocks or bonds, it shall be accompanied by the fees necessary for the appraisal thereof, except as otherwise provided by Article 3, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1917.)
-------------------------------------------

948.

Whenever an insurer has deposited with the commissioner the requisite security, in conformity with the requirements of this article, the commissioner shall issue to such insurer, under his official seal, a certificate of such deposit for each State or country requiring such certificate. Such certificate shall state the items and amount of securities so deposited, and their value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

949.

The commissioner shall require the payment of seventy-two dollars ($72), in advance, as a fee for each certificate issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 17.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

950.

Whenever such a depositing insurer has paid, canceled, or reinsured all its unexpired policies outstanding in this State, and all its liabilities under such policies are extinguished, or assumed by other responsible insurers, it may apply to the commissioner for return of its deposit. Such application shall be in writing and verified. If on such application, and from an examination of the books of the insurer and of its officers under oath, the commissioner is satisfied that all of its policies are so paid, canceled, extinguished, or reinsured, he shall deliver up to the insurer the securities deposited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

951.

Pending such examination the securities requested to be withdrawn may continue subject to withdrawal and substitution as provided by section 943.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

952.

Whenever the laws of any other state or country, by reason of which Section 940 is brought into force, are repealed and abrogated, then any deposit with the commissioner under and by reason of that section shall be delivered up to the depositing insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

953.

Whenever a domestic insurer deposits securities with an officer of this State, in order to enable it to do business in another State pursuant to the laws of such other State, if such insurer thereafter ceases to do business in such other State and files conclusive evidence that all policies written in such other State have expired or been paid, canceled or reinsured, the securities shall on demand be returned to the depositing insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

954.

The commissioner shall make an annual examination of the securities received by him from each insurer. If it appears at any time that the securities deposited by any such insurer amount to less than the sum required for the purposes for which the deposit was made, he shall notify the insurer thereof. Unless the deficiency is made up within thirty days after the notice, the commissioner shall revoke the insurer’s certificate of authority, countermand all the certificates issued to the insurer under this article, and give notice thereof to the officers of the several States to whom the certificate has been transmitted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

955.

All appraisal fees collected by the commissioner under the provisions of this article shall be paid into the State treasury in trust and withdrawn as provided by law for withdrawal of trust funds from the State treasury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

956.

An account or accounts in one or more banks or savings and loan associations the accounts of which are insured by an agency or instrumentality of the federal government shall be accepted as securities comprising any part of any deposit made with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Wildfire Safety and Risk Mitigation Program [970. - 978.]

970.

(a) The Wildfire Safety and Risk Mitigation Program is hereby established.

(b) The purpose of the program is to provide funding to one or more universities for the purpose of creating a research and educational center responsible for developing, demonstrating, and deploying a public wildfire catastrophe model that provides significant wildfire safety benefits to California communities and assists alignment of federal, state, and local wildfire risk reduction efforts.

(c) Projects eligible for a grant under this article include either of the following:

(1) The development of a public wildfire catastrophe model that
 can provide insight for state and local emergency planners, aid wildfire safety efforts that protect lives and property, increase research and development on wildfire risk mitigation strategies, inform actuarial analyses, create training opportunities for students and professionals, and support effective insurance regulation and financial oversight of insurance, risk assessments, and insurance company solvency risks and risk management.

(2) The development of outreach initiatives to identify and educate potential users of a public wildfire catastrophe model, including, but not limited to, state and local emergency planners, wildfire safety groups, agricultural and business groups, research organizations, and educators.

(d) For the purposes of this article, a “public
 wildfire catastrophe model” means a computerized process that uses the best available science to simulate potential property damage caused by major wildfires and has readily accessible documentation and programs, including, but not limited to, underlying data and algorithms, for use by public agencies, organizations, and individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

(a) The Wildfire Safety and Risk Mitigation Program shall be administered by the department. 

(b) The department shall award grants on a competitive basis. The department shall establish minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants. In determining these standards, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Outline performance criteria and metrics. 

(2) Ensure that the program is administered in furtherance of applicable insurance laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, Sections 2642.7, 2644.16, 2644.25,
 2644.4.5, and 2644.9 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Consider research and development of modeling techniques and actuarial analyses specific to the effectiveness of actions to mitigate and prevent the risk of loss due to wildfires, including those actions at the property, community, and regional scale by utilities and local, state, and federal governments.

(4) Promote publicly accessible information to inform individual property and community-scale mitigation planning, focusing on reducing the primary risk factors for wildfire catastrophes through providing regional and property-level risk assessments.

(5) Leverage, to the maximum extent feasible, federal or private funding.

(6) Ensure activities undertaken pursuant to this article complement efforts by the federal government and private industries, including insurance, to achieve wildfire safety at the community scale. 

(7) Ensure activities undertaken pursuant to this article complement wildfire mitigation priorities identified in local and state hazard mitigation plans and in after-action reports following federal major disaster declarations related to wildfires.

(8) Consider recommendations to the commissioner by the Public Wildfire Catastrophe Model Strategy Group.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

In evaluating grant proposals pursuant to this article, the department shall give priority to projects that demonstrate one or more of the following:

(a) A benefit to disadvantaged communities determined under Sections 39711 and 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, vulnerable communities as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 71340 of the Public Resources Code, and where insurance access has become a major challenge for the public due to wildfire risk.

(b) Assistance to state and local governments in protecting communities from devastating wildfire disasters and promoting equitable recovery.

(c) An educational benefit for California students to train a future workforce in the effective use of available data and modeling tools for planning, risk analysis and reduction, and actuarial approaches, with a focus on collaboration between multiple universities and public higher education institutions.

(d) The availability for use by governments and others in running scenarios to help reduce the risks of loss of life and property.

(e) The availability of publicly accessible information useful for property-level risk assessments with
 sufficient detail to be useful for community and property mitigation planning, focusing on reducing the primary risk factors for wildfire catastrophes, including property- and community-level actions.

(f) The understanding of environmental factors that affect the risk of loss, including extreme temperatures, drought, and other conditions.

(g) The ability to improve consumer information, relief, transparency, and understanding about catastrophe modeling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

(a) The department shall create a framework and multiyear plan with available data for the development, demonstration, and deployment of a public wildfire catastrophe model created pursuant to a grant provided by this article.

(b) The framework and plan shall be published on the department’s internet website upon completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

974.

The Wildfire Safety and Risk Mitigation Account is hereby created within the Insurance Fund. Funds in the account shall fund the development, demonstration, and deployment of public wildfire catastrophe modeling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

975.

Upon implementation of the first round of grants issued pursuant to this article, the department shall identify, publish, and make available on its internet website key milestones for the completion of a public wildfire catastrophe model, including additional research, outreach, and operational steps needed to fully establish the model.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

976.

The department shall provide recommendations to the Senate Committee on Insurance, Assembly Committee on Insurance, Assembly Committee on Emergency Management, Budget Committees, and the Governor for future budget allocations related to this article before September 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

This article shall not be construed to limit or conflict with the commissioner’s authority regarding rate regulation, or any other provisions of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 978.)
-------------------------------------------

978.

This article shall be operative upon appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 429)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Insolvency [980. - 989.]

980.

As used in this article, “liability” includes liability for losses reported, expenses, taxes, and all other indebtedness not included in those categories.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

Any mortgage insurer or any mortgage guaranty insurer is insolvent whenever provision for its liabilities and for unearned income would, after exhausting its required insurance surplus, impair its capital paid in so as to reduce it below two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or below 75 percent of the aggregate par value of its issued capital stock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

(a) On or after January 1, 1970, as used in this article and in subdivision (i) of Section 1011, “insolvency” means either of the following:

(1) Any impairment of minimum “paid-in capital” or “capital paid in,” as defined in Section 36, required in the aggregate of an insurer by the provisions of this code for the class, or classes, of insurance that it transacts anywhere.

(2) An inability of the insurer to meet its financial obligations when they are due.

(b) On or after January 1, 1970, an insurer cannot escape the condition of insolvency by being able to
 provide for all its liabilities and for reinsurance of all outstanding risks. An insurer must also be possessed of additional assets equivalent to the aggregate “paid-in capital” or “capital paid in” required by this code after making provision for all those liabilities and for that reinsurance.

(c) On or after October 1, 1967, as used in this code provision for reinsurance of all outstanding risks and “gross premiums without any deduction, received and receivable upon all unexpired risks” means the greater of: (1) the aggregate amount of actual unearned premiums, or (2) the amount reasonably estimated as being required to reinsure in a solvent admitted insurer the unexpired terms of the risks represented by all outstanding policies.

(d) On or after October 1, 1967, an insurer shall make
 provision for reinsurance of the outstanding risk on policies that provide premiums that are fully earned at inception and on policies that for any other reason do not provide for a return premium to the insured on cancellation prior to expiration.

(e) On or after October 1, 1967, the commissioner shall prescribe standards for reasonably estimating the amount required to reinsure that will provide adequate safeguards for the policyholders, creditors, and the public.

(f) On or after October 1, 1967, this section shall not be applicable to life, title, mortgage, or mortgage guaranty insurers.

(g) In the application of this section to disability insurance, as defined in Section 106, reserves for unearned premiums and amounts
 reasonably estimated as required to reinsure outstanding risks shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 6.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

985.5.

In the case of the insolvency of an admitted insurer, the commissioner shall prepare a report, which shall be a public record, with respect to the causes and factors which contributed to that insolvency. The report shall be submitted to the Governor and to the Legislature no later than one year from the date of the insolvency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

985.6.

The costs incurred in investigating and preparing the report required by Section 985.5 shall be an expense of administration within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1562, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

A life insurer issuing policies on a reserve basis is insolvent whenever its assets are exceeded by the total of the following: (1) the amount necessary to provide for its liabilities; (2) the amount of paid-in capital, as defined in Section 36, required by the provisions of Sections 10510, 10511, and 10512; (3) the amount necessary to provide for reinsurance of all its outstanding risks at the following rates:

(a) In the case of contracts issued in a foreign country, upon the lives of residents thereof, by a domestic insurer authorized to and doing business in that foreign country, the rates shall be in accordance with the standard of mortality approved by the commissioner, as provided by law.

(b) In the case of group insurance, at the rates required by law for valuation thereof.

(c) In the case of all other outstanding risks written prior to January 1, 1892, at the rates based upon the American Experience Table of Mortality with interest at the rate of 412 percent per annum.

(d) In the case of all its other outstanding risks written from and after December 31, 1891, up to and including December 31, 1907, at rates based upon the Combined Experience or Actuaries’ Table of Mortality with interest at the rate of 4 percent per annum.

(e) In the case of all its other outstanding risks written from and after December 31, 1907, and prior to the operative date as to such risks of Article 3a (commencing with Section 10159.1), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2, at rates based upon the American Experience Table of Mortality with interest at the rate of 312 percent per annum, and, where applicable, in accordance with Section 10486.9. 

(f) In the case of contracts of disability insurance, as defined in Section 106, according to the standards provided in Section 997.

(g) In the case of all other risks, according to the standards provided in Article 3a (commencing with Section 10489.1), Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

A title insurer is insolvent whenever provision for its liabilities would, after exhausting its required surplus, so far impair its capital paid in as to reduce it below two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or below 75 percent of the aggregate par value of its issued capital stock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

988.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Impaired” means a financial situation in which the assets of an insurer are less than the sum of the insurer’s minimum required capital, minimum required surplus and all liabilities as determined in accordance with the requirements for the preparation and filing of the annual statement of an insurer.

(2) “Chief executive officer” means the person, irrespective of title, designated by the board of directors or trustees of an insurer as the person charged with the responsibility of administering and implementing the insurer’s policies and procedures.

(b) Whenever an insurer is impaired, its chief executive officer shall immediately notify the commissioner, in writing of that impairment and shall also immediately notify in writing all of the board of directors or trustees of the insurer. Any officer, director, or trustee of an insurer shall notify the person serving as chief executive officer of the impairment of the insurer in the event the officer, director, or trustee knows or has reason to know that the insurer is impaired.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

Any person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by not more than one year in county jail:

(a) Conceals any property belonging to an insurer.

(b) Transfers or conceals in contemplation of a state insolvency proceeding his or her own property or property belonging to an insurer.

(c) Conceals, destroys, mutilates, alters or makes a false entry in any document which affects or relates to the property of an insurer or withholds any such document from a receiver, trustee or other officer of a court entitled to its possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 302, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.3. Obligations of Automobile Insurers and Their Agents Under Contingent and Retrospective Compensation Arrangements [995. - 995.7.]

995.

(a) As used in this article, “contingent compensation arrangement” means an arrangement having as its purpose the payment of a variable commission by the insurer, depending on the overall operating profit on the insurance business produced and handled by the payee, with other provisions of the arrangement auxiliary or incidental to such purpose.

(b) As used in this article, “retrospective commission arrangement” means an arrangement having as its purpose the retention by the insurer of a fixed proportion of the gross premiums, or gross premiums plus policy fees with the balance of the premiums, or premiums plus policy fees, retained by the producer of the business, who assumes to pay therefrom all losses, all subordinate commissions, loss adjustment expenses and his profit, if any, with other provisions of the arrangement auxiliary or incidental to such purpose.

(c) The phrases defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section shall not be deemed to include a contingent commission arrangement of a producer, managing general agent, surplus line broker, or general agent based wholly or partly on underwriting results, unless the arrangement guarantees an agreed return to the insurer which may exceed the underwriting profit actually earned by the insurer on business written through the producer, managing general agent, surplus line broker, or general agent.

(d) As used in this article, “policy fee” means any sum specified in the policy as paid, or payable, in addition to the specified premium, as a consideration for the policy; and does not include expenses customarily charged to the insured which are not recited in the policy.

(e) This article shall apply only to automobile and automobile liability insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.1.

An agent, broker, surplus line broker, general agent or other person operating under a contingent or retrospective compensation arrangement with any insurer shall promptly notify the insurer of every policy claim against the insurer of which he has knowledge with sufficient particulars to enable the insurer to establish an adequate claim reserve. Every insurer so notified of a policy claim or receiving independent knowledge of any policy claim shall promptly make a record thereof and establish a claim reserve for the same.

If the commissioner has reason to believe such agent, broker, general agent or other person is not so notifying the insurer, he shall give the insurer seven days written notice of such belief and if the insurer does not correct the situation within seven days thereafter he may examine such agent, broker, general agent or other person at the expense of the insurer.

In the case of any arrangement whereby the producer receives from the insurer an initial percentage commission to be augmented if loss ratios or profits are more favorable than a stated standard, the insurer shall establish a contingent commission reserve for the amount, if any, which will become due to the producer because of such favorable loss ratios or profits.

Notwithstanding any provision of the contingent or retrospective arrangement, such claims and contingent commission reserves shall be a liability of the insurer.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to prohibit reasonable arrangements between a managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent and an insurer which provide (a) for the amount of claim reserve to be recommended by the managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent to the insurer, without particulars other than those needed by the insurer to establish the claim reserve on its books, or (b) for the handling of claim reserves on smaller claims of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) each on a bulk or group basis, upon recommendation of the amount by the managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent, or (c) for the handling of losses not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) each by the managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent without establishment of claim reserves, or (d) for the reporting of losses and recommended reserves by the managing general agent, surplus line broker, or general agent on a monthly basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.2.

An insurer shall not claim as an asset by reason of any provision of a contingent or retrospective compensation arrangement, any account due from the other party pursuant to such an arrangement in an amount in excess of the money actually held by such party in a trusteed bank account for such insurer, unless such party is solvent without giving effect to any contingent or retrospective compensation not specifically acknowledged in writing by the insurer as settled in amount and payable in cash, or usable as an absolute offset against the insurer, within 90 days.

If the commissioner has reason to doubt the solvency of any person dealing with an insurer under a contingent or retrospective commission arrangement, he may examine him at the expense of the insurer.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to modify any provision contained in Section 1735 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.3.

Every person operating under a retrospective or contingent compensation arrangement with any insurer shall report to the insurer within a reasonable time, and policy by policy, the full premium charge including any policy fee made to the insured and the amount of premium and policy fee, if any, collected from the insured in respect to each such policy. Such reporting need not be policy by policy in a case where such arrangement covers only policies which are all uniform in coverage, uniform as to premium and such premium is not over ten dollars ($10) annually.

If the commissioner has reason to believe any such person is not complying with this section, he shall give the insurer seven days written notice of such belief and if the insurer does not correct the situation within seven days thereafter, he may examine such person at the expense of the insurer.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to prohibit or invalidate use of the bordereau method of accounting or accounting by transmission of computer data by a managing general agent, surplus line broker, or general agent, nor to require him to report premium collections to an insurer where the managing general agent, surplus line broker, or general agent is liable to pay the insurer bordereau or accounting balances in full whether collected or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.4.

An insurer, notwithstanding the provisions of any contingent or retrospective compensation arrangement with any person, shall maintain as a liability, as part of its unearned premium reserve the unearned portion of all premium charges made to insureds without deduction for uncollected charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.5.

An insurer, notwithstanding the provisions of any contingent or retrospective compensation arrangement with any person, shall report and pay the premium tax liability set forth in the Revenue and Taxation Code on the basis that it has received the full premium charge including policy fees made to the insureds under policies less return premiums as permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------
